Vermont, session 2025-2026, H701.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 165 is amended to read:
§ 165. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS; EQUAL EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES; INDEPENDENT SCHOOL MEETING
EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS
VT LEG #386167 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.701
2026 Page 2 of 5
* * *
(b)(1) Annually, the Secretary shall determine whether students in each
Vermont public school are provided educational opportunities substantially
equal to those provided in other public schools. If the Secretary determines
that a school is not meeting the education quality standards listed in subsection
(a) of this section or that the school is making insufficient progress in
improving student performance in relation to the standards for student
performance set forth in subdivision 164(9) of this title, the Secretary shall
describe in writing actions that a district must take in order to meet either or
both sets of standards and shall provide technical assistance to the school. If
the school fails to meet the standards or make sufficient progress within two
years following the determination, the Secretary shall recommend to the State
Board one or more of the following actions: listed in subdivisions (A)–(E) of
this subdivision. Any recommendation from the Secretary shall be
accompanied by nonselective, comprehensive, and district-validated multiyear
data to justify the recommendation.
(1)(A) the The Agency continue to shall provide in-person weekly
technical assistance for one more cycle of review;.
(2)(B) the The State Board shall adjust supervisory union boundaries or
responsibilities of the superintendency pursuant to section 261 of this title;.
VT LEG #386167 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.701
2026 Page 3 of 5
(3)(C) the The Secretary shall assume administrative control of an
individual school, school district, or supervisory union, including budgetary
control to ensure sound financial practices, only to the extent necessary to
correct deficiencies;.
(i) If the Secretary assumes full budgetary and management
control over the school, the Secretary shall demonstrate within two years after
assuming control that the school has corrected the deficiencies that led to the
Secretary’s recommendation. Failure of the Secretary to do so will result in
restoration of administrative control of the school back to the local school
board.
(ii) Should the Secretary’s control of the school result in the
correction of the originally identified deficiencies within two years after the
Secretary assuming control, the Secretary shall either:
(I) continue to maintain control over the school for up to five
years; or
(II) conditionally return control of the school to the local school
board with a mutually agreed upon sustainability plan in place.
(iii) Should the Secretary return control of the school to the school
board due to failure to correct the identified deficiencies within two years after
the Secretary assuming control of the school, return of control to the school
board shall not be conditional and the school shall not be subject to actions
VT LEG #386167 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.701
2026 Page 4 of 5
under this subsection (b) for the same deficiencies for a minimum of two years
from the date control was returned to the school board.
(iv) The superintendent shall cooperate with the requests of the
Secretary during any period the Secretary has assumed control of a school
pursuant to this subsection (b), but shall continue to report only to the school
board or boards within the superintendent’s supervisory union in accordance
with the provisions of the superintendent’s contract.
(4)(D) the The State Board shall close an individual school or schools
and require that the school district pay tuition to another public school or an
approved independent school pursuant to chapter 21 of this title; or.
(5)(E) the The State Board shall require two or more school districts to
consolidate their governance structures.
(2) The Secretary shall not recommend action pursuant to this
subsection against a district for which three years of student performance data
for all tested subjects demonstrate, in aggregate, a higher average rate of
growth than the average rate of growth statewide if the action recommended is
justified primarily by student performance data.
(3) The Secretary shall not recommend action against a district pursuant
to this subsection if the basis of such action is the student performance data of
a demographic group for which no comparative data exists in at least three
separate and distinct school districts showing that the district for which the
VT LEG #386167 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.701
2026 Page 5 of 5
action is considered has significantly and chronically underperformed when
compared to similar demographic groups in the State or when the comparative
samples are not statistically adequate to support the Secretary’s conclusions
and accompanying recommendations.
(c) The State Board, after offering the school board an opportunity for a
hearing, shall either dismiss the Secretary’s recommendation or order that one
or more of the actions listed in subsection (b) of this section be taken. The
action ordered by the State Board shall be the least intrusive consistent with the
need to provide students attending the school substantially equal educational
opportunities. A school board aggrieved by an order of the State Board may
appeal the order in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386167 v.2